test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ava_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - ава: # Ordinary nouns 'woman' - full paradigm including MWN
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ава
     ава+N+SP+Gen+Indef: авань
     ава+N+SP+Abl+Indef: авада
     ава+N+SP+Dat+Indef: аванди
     ава+N+SP+Abe+Indef: авафтома
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: авашка
     ава+N+SP+Ine+Indef: аваса
     ава+N+SP+Ela+Indef: аваста
     ава+N+SP+Ill+Indef: авас
     ава+N+SP+Prl+Indef: авава
     ава+N+SP+Tra+Indef: авакс
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: авазе
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: аване
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: авазень
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: аванень
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [авазти, авазенди]
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: аваненди
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: авадон
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: авафтомон
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: авашкан
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: авасон
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: авастон
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: авазон
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: ававан
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: аваце
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: аватне
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: авацень
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: аватнень
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: авадот
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: авафтомот
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: авашкат
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: авасот
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: авастот
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: авазт
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: авават
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: авац
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: аванза
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: аванц
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: аванзон
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: аванцты
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: аванзонды
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: авадонза
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: авафтомонза
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: авашканза
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: авасонза
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: авастонза
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: авазонза
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: ававанза
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: аваньке
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: аваньконь
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: аваньконди
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: авадонк
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: авафтомонк
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: авашканк
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: авасонк
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: авастонк
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: авазонк
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: ававанк
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: аванте
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: авантень
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: авантенди
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: авадонт
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: авафтомонт
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: авашкант
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: авасонт
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: авастонт
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: авазонт
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: ававант
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: авасна
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: аваснон
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: аваснонды
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: авадост
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: авафтомост
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: авашкаст
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: авасост
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: авастост
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: авазост
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: ававаст
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ават
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def: авась
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def: авать
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def: авати
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def: аватне
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def: аватнень
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def: аватненди  
     ава+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: аваня  
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: ававок
     ава+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: аваньге
     ава+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: авадовок
     ава+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: [авандивок, авандиге, авандинге]
     ава+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: авафтомовок
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: авашкавок
     ава+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: авасовок
     ава+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: авастовок
     ава+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: аваска
     ава+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: авававок
     ава+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: авакска
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авазевок
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: аваневок
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авазеньге
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: аваненьге
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [авазендивок, авазтивок, авазендиге, авазтиге, авазендинге, авазтинге]
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [аванендивок, аванендиге, аванендинге]
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авадонга
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авафтомонга
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авашканга
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авасонга
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авастонга
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: авазонга
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: ававанга
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авацевок
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: аватневок
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: аваценьге
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: аватненьге
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авадотка
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авафтомотка
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авашкатка
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авасотка
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авастотка
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: авазтка
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: ававатка
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авацка
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: аванзовок
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: аванцка
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: аванзонга
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: аванцтывок
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: аванзондывок
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авадонзовок
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авафтомонзовок
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авашканзовок
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авасонзовок
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авастонзовок
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: авазонзовок
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: ававанзовок
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: аванькевок
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: аваньконьге
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: [аванькондивок, аванькондиге, аванькондинге]
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авадонковок
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авафтомонковок
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авашканковок
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авасонковок
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авастонковок
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: авазонковок
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: ававанковок
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авантевок
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авантеньге
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: [авантендивок, авантендиге, авантендинге]
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авадонтовок
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авафтомонтовок
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авашкантовок
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авасонтовок
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авастонтовок
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: авазонтовок
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: ававантовок
     ава+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авасновок
     ава+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: аваснонга
     ава+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: аваснондывок
     ава+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авадостка
     ава+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авафтомостка
     ава+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авашкастка
     ава+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авасостка
     ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авастостка
     ава+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: авазостка
     ава+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: ававастка
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: аватка
     ава+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: аваське
     ава+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: аватьке
     ава+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [авативок, аватиге, аватинге]
     ава+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: аватневок
     ава+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: аватненьге
     ава+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [аватнендивок, аватнендиге, аватнендинге]
